Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-703
Act; exemptions.

(1) Except as provided in section 45-704, the following shall be exempt from the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act:

(a) Any depository institution or wholly owned subsidiary thereof;

(b) Any registered bank holding company;

(c) Any insurance company that is subject to regulation by the Department of Insurance and is either (i) organized or chartered under the laws of Nebraska or (ii) organized or chartered under the laws of any other state if such insurance company has a place of business in Nebraska;

(d) Any person licensed to practice law in this state in connection with activities that are (i) considered the practice of law by the Supreme Court, (ii) carried out within an attorney-client relationship, and (iii) accomplished by the attorney in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, ethics, and standards;

(e) Any person licensed in this state as a real estate broker or real estate salesperson pursuant to section 81-885.02 who is engaging in real estate brokerage activities unless such person is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator;

(f) Any registered mortgage loan originator when acting for an entity described in subdivision (24)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of section 45-702;

(g) Any sales finance company licensed pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act if such sales finance company does not engage in mortgage banking business in any capacity other than as a purchaser or servicer of an installment sales contract, as defined in section 45-335, which is secured by a mobile home or trailer;

(h) Any trust company chartered pursuant to the Nebraska Trust Company Act;

(i) Any wholly owned subsidiary of an organization listed in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection if the listed organization maintains a place of business in Nebraska;

(j) Any individual who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of an immediate family member of the individual;

(k) Any individual who does not repetitively and habitually engage in the business of a mortgage banker, a mortgage loan originator, or a loan processor or underwriter, either inside or outside of this state, who (i) makes a residential mortgage loan with his or her own funds for his or her own investment, (ii) makes a purchase-money mortgage, or (iii) finances the sale of a dwelling or residential real estate owned by such individual without the intent to resell the residential mortgage loan;

(l) Any employee or independent agent of a mortgage banker licensed or registered pursuant to the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act or exempt from the act if such employee or independent agent does not conduct the activities of a mortgage loan originator or loan processor or underwriter;

(m) The United States of America; the State of Nebraska; any other state, district, territory, commonwealth, or possession of the United States of America; any city, county, or other political subdivision; and any agency or division of any of the foregoing;

(n) The Nebraska Investment Finance Authority;

(o) Any individual who is an employee of an entity described in subdivision (m) or (n) of this subsection and who acts as a mortgage loan originator or loan processor or underwriter only pursuant to his or her official duties as an employee of such entity;

(p) A bona fide nonprofit organization which has received a certificate of exemption pursuant to section 45-703.01; and

(q) Any employee of a bona fide nonprofit organization which has received a certificate of exemption pursuant to section 45-703.01 if such employee acts as a mortgage loan originator or mortgage loan processor or underwriter (i) only with respect to his or her work duties for the nonprofit organization and (ii) only with respect to residential mortgage loans with terms that are favorable to the borrower.

(2) It shall not be necessary to negate any of the exemptions provided in this section in any complaint, information, indictment, or other writ or proceedings brought under the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act, and the burden of establishing the right to any exemption shall be upon the person claiming the benefit of such exemption.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 31;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 22;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 50;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 20;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 103.

Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, see section 45-334.

Nebraska Trust Company Act, see section 8-201.01.